Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-6,101
Department; duties.

The department shall:

(1) Adopt and promulgate rules and regulations, including a uniform system of classification of Parkinson's disease which is consistent with medically and clinically accepted standards and definitions for use in reporting by medical personnel treating the disease;

(2) Execute any contracts that the department deems necessary to carry out the Parkinson's Disease Registry Act;

(3) Receive and record the data obtained from reports filed under sections 81-6,102 and 81-6,103; and

(4) Comply with all necessary requirements to obtain funds or grants.

Laws 2001, LB 152, § 9;

Laws 2005, LB 301, § 67.